Tennessee statutes. Title 65 Public Utilities and Carriers
Chapter 22

Light, Heat and Power Companies

65-22-101. Acquisition of land.

Every corporation organized under the laws of any state of the United States and authorized to construct, own, and operate gas or electric plants or both for the purpose of furnishing gas or electricity or both to persons in this state or in this state and elsewhere, or authorized to engage in the business of reducing, generating, and furnishing light, heat, electricity and electrical and mechanical power generated or produced from steam power or water power obtained by a dam or dams across any stream or streams of water, or authorized to store, transport or distribute natural or artificial gas or oil to be used in producing light, heat or mechanical power, for sale to the public generally or to utility corporations for resale to the public generally, and, for any or all of such purposes, authorized to construct and maintain pipelines, is empowered to condemn and take upon paying or securing payment thereof, to purchase or otherwise acquire, such lands and interests in and by whomsoever owned as may be necessary or advisable in the construction, maintenance, and operation of either its gas or electric plants or both, and likewise to acquire the right to use, employ, and divert such water flowing in and running into any stream or watercourse as may be necessary or advisable in the exercise of its charter powers, such lands and interests in lands as may be necessary or advisable for establishing and maintaining its power houses, canals, flumes, conduits, pipelines, reservoirs, ponds, dams, transmission lines and other works, the rights-of-way for lines of poles, towers, wires, and transmission lines through any and all lands between its reservoirs, ponds, dams, power houses and other works and the cities and towns and other points at which its light, heat, water, electricity and electrical and mechanical or gas power may be transmitted, consumed or disposed of, such lands and interests in lands as may be necessary or advisable to place its electric wire, conductors, conduits, ditches, canals, flumes, pipelines, and transmission lines either above or underground; and every such corporation may at any time enter thereon and repair same or when deemed necessary or advisable may place additional equipment, appliances or appurtenances; provided, that such electric wires, conductors, conduits, ditches, canals, flumes, pipelines and transmission lines shall be placed in such manner as to do as little injury to the property of private persons as possible; and provided further, that every such corporation shall make compensation to the owners of the real estate condemned or taken through which its electric wires, conductors, conduits, ditches, canals, flumes, pipelines and transmission lines may be placed. If the owner and the corporation cannot agree upon the amount of compensation which should be paid, the taking shall proceed and the damages or compensation to be paid shall be assessed in the manner provided by title 29, chapter 16.

Acts 1925, ch. 56, § 1; Shan. Supp., § 1880a32; mod. Code 1932, §§ 3167, 3942; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-2201.

Cross-References. Assessment of property for tax purposes, title 67, ch. 5, part 13.

Situs of property for tax purposes, § 67-5-502.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 10 Tenn. Juris., Eminent Domain, §§ 7, 17, 47; 13 Tenn. Juris., Gas Companies, § 8.

Law Reviews.

The Movement for New Water Rights Laws in the Tennessee Valley States (Robert H. Marquis, Richard M. Freeman and Milton S. Heath, Jr.), 23 Tenn. L. Rev. 797 (1955).

Attorney General Opinions. A pipeline corporation has the right to condemn an easement for pipelines that will be used for the transportation and distribution of liquid petroleum products such as gasoline, kerosene, home heating oil, or jet fuel, OAG 01-171, 2001 Tenn. AG LEXIS 175 (12/12/01).

65-22-102. Dams in navigable streams.

There shall be placed and maintained, in connection with the corporation's dam or dams and other works in navigable rivers and streams of this state, within the limits of navigation in such streams and rivers, a sluiceway, lock, or other fixture sufficient and so arranged as to permit logs, timber, lumber, and boats to pass around, through, or over the dam or dams or other works without unreasonable delay or hindrance, and without toll or charges.

Before the work is commenced in such navigable rivers and streams within the limits of navigation in such rivers and streams, the plans and details thereof shall be submitted to the secretary of the army of the United States for the secretary's approval. The secretary may at any time require such changes and alterations to be made in such works, at the expense of the corporation, as are deemed advisable and necessary in the interest of navigation.

The work permitted in this section to be done in navigable waters shall be subject to the supervision and approval of the engineer officer of the United States army in charge of the locality.

Acts 1895, ch. 208, §§ 1, 2; 1901, ch. 144, § 1; Shan., § 2485; mod. Code 1932, §§ 3937-3939; modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 65-2202 — 65-2204.

Law Reviews.

The Movement for New Water Rights Laws in the Tennessee Valley States (Robert H. Marquis, Richard M. Freeman and Milton S. Heath, Jr.), 23 Tenn. L. Rev. 797 (1955).

Water Rights in Tennessee (Mahlon L. Townsend), 27 Tenn. L. Rev. 557 (1960).

65-22-103. Wires, conduits, conductors, pipes, and pipelines.

Such corporation, after having first obtained permission from the governing authorities thereof, is invested with the privilege of extending and placing its electric wires, conduits, conductors, pipes, and pipelines along, through, or upon all or any of the streets, lanes, and alleys of the cities, towns, and villages in which it may operate; and in, through, and along any and all of the roads and public highways of the counties, for the purpose of supplying electricity, or electric or mechanical power to the inhabitants thereof for heat, light, manufacturing, domestic, or sanitary or other purposes; and for such purposes it may make any and all necessary excavations in and along the same after first obtaining permission from the governing authorities of the incorporated cities, towns, and villages, and when outside of any incorporated towns, of the governing authority of the county in which same is located; but all excavation shall be made in such manner as to give the least inconvenience to the public, and shall be replaced with all possible speed by and at the expense of the corporation in as substantial manner as found before being excavated.

Acts 1909, ch. 127, § 3; Shan., § 2489a3; mod. Code 1932, § 3940; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-2205.

Cross-References. Destruction or interference with utility lines, fixtures or appliances, § 39-14-411.

Municipal power over franchises, § 6-54-109.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 19 Tenn. Juris., Monopolies and Restraints of Trade, § 4.

65-22-104. Contracts for services.

Such corporation may also contract with cities, towns, and villages, and with persons, for supplying them with water, light, heat, electricity, electrical and mechanical powers, and any other article or thing which it may produce or handle.

Acts 1909, ch. 127, § 4; Shan., § 2489a4; Code 1932, § 3941; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-2206.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 19 Tenn. Juris., Monopolies and Restraints of Trade, § 4.

65-22-105. Manufacture and sale of ice or other products.

Corporations for the purpose of engaging in the business of generating and furnishing electric light or power, may engage in the business of manufacturing and selling, at wholesale or retail, ice, or other products.

Such electric light and power corporations, as exercise the power given by subsection (a), shall pay the same privilege taxes therefor on such manufacturing and retail or wholesale trade of manufactured products as other corporations incorporated for such manufacturing purposes are required to pay, in addition to the privilege taxes required by law for engaging in the electric light and power business.

Acts 1921, ch. 148, §§ 1, 2; Shan. Supp., §§ 2485a1, 2485a2; mod. Code 1932, §§ 3943, 3944; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 65-2207, 65-2208.

Cross-References. Privilege tax on gas, water and electric companies, § 67-4-405.

65-22-106. Consolidation.

A corporation organized to engage in the business of a water company, may combine in its charter the powers, duties and liabilities of a lighting and power company, and engage in the latter business; and vice versa.

Mod. Code 1932, § 4075; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-2209.

Collateral References.

Consolidation and merger under power of eminent domain of public utility corporations, constitutionality of statutes providing for. 66 A.L.R. 1568.